Illinois, session 104th, HB5727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Road Fund 6to the Illinois State Police for installation and maintenance 7of camera systems under the Expressway Camera Act and for 8associated telecommunications costs and camera warranties. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.